Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 2. Maximum Charges

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of usury laws to transaction characterized as “leases,” 94 ALR3d 640.

§ 40-14-310.
Consumer loan finance charges.

With respect to a consumer loan and except as provided for pawnbrokers under W.S. 40-14-360(a) and post-dated check cashers under W.S. 40-14-363(a), a lender may contract for and receive a loan finance charge as provided by this section.

This section does not limit or restrict the manner of contracting for the loan finance charge, whether by way of add-on, discount, or otherwise, so long as the rate of the loan finance charge does not exceed that permitted by this section. The loan finance charge may be contracted for and earned at the single annual percentage rate that would earn the same finance charge as the graduated rates when the debt is paid according to the agreed terms and the calculations are made according to the actuarial method. If the loan is precomputed:

The loan finance charge may be calculated on the assumption that all scheduled payments will be made when due; and

The effect of prepayment is governed by the provisions on rebate upon prepayment (W.S.

40-14-319

).

For the purposes of this section, the term of a loan commences with the date the loan is made. Differences in the lengths of months are disregarded and a day may be counted as one-thirtieth of a month. Subject to classifications and differentiations the lender may reasonably establish, a part of a month in excess of fifteen (15) days may be treated as a full month if periods of fifteen (15) days or less are disregarded and if that procedure is not consistently used to obtain a greater yield than would otherwise be permitted.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 14, § 3.

Subject to classifications and differentiations the lender may reasonably establish, he may make the same loan finance charge on all amounts financed within a specified range. A loan finance charge so made does not violate subsection (g) of this section if:

When applied to the median amount within each range, it does not exceed the maximum permitted by subsection (g) of this section; and

When applied to the lowest amount within each range, it does not produce a rate of loan finance charge exceeding the rate calculated according to paragraph (i) of this subsection by more than eight percent (8%) of the rate calculated according to paragraph (i) of this subsection.

Except as provided for pawnbrokers in W.S. 40-14-360(f) and post-dated check cashers in W.S.

40-14-363

, a lender may contract for and receive a minimum loan finance charge of not more than thirty dollars ($30.00).

A loan finance charge, calculated according to the actuarial method, shall not exceed the equivalent of thirty-six percent (36%) per year on that part of the unpaid balances of the principal that is equal to or less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) and shall not exceed the equivalent of twenty-one percent (21%) per year on that part of the unpaid balances of the principal that is greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

If an unpaid balance exists on a consumer loan in a revolving account on the date on which the loan finance charge is applied, the lender may contract for and receive a charge in accordance with this subsection. For accounts with a billing cycle of thirty (30) days or more, the lender may receive a charge not to exceed three dollars ($3.00). For accounts with a billing cycle of less than thirty (30) days, the lender may receive a charge not to exceed the pro rata part of three dollars ($3.00) that bears the same relation to three dollars ($3.00) as the number of days in the billing cycle bears to thirty (30). No charge shall be made under this subsection for an account if the lender has made an annual charge for the same period as permitted by the provisions on additional charges (W.S. 40-14-311(a)(iii)).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-201; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-201; Laws 1996, ch. 86, § 2; 2021 ch. 14, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendments —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section heading, which read, "Loan finance charge for consumer loans other than supervised loans"; rewrote (a), which read, "With respect to a consumer loan other than a supervised loan (W.S.

40-14-341

), a lender may contract for and receive a loan finance charge, calculated according to the actuarial method, not exceeding ten percent (10%) per year on the unpaid balances of the principal"; added the second sentence in (b); substituted "(g)" for "(a)" following subsection" in (e) and (e)(i); in (f), deleted "Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, and" at the beginning and made stylistic changes; and added (g) and (h).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (d), which read, "With respect to a consumer loan made pursuant to a revolving loan account:

“(i) The loan finance charge shall be deemed not to exceed ten percent (10%) per year if the loan finance charge contracted for and received does not exceed a charge in each monthly billing cycle which is five-sixths of one percent of an amount no greater than:

“(A) The average daily balance of the debt;

“(B) The unpaid balance of the debt on the same day of the billing cycle; or

“(C) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, the median amount within a specified range within which the average daily balance or the unpaid balance of the debt, on the same day of the billing cycle, is included; for the purposes of this paragraph and subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, a variation of not more than four (4) days from month to month is 'the same day of the billing cycle'.

“(ii) If the billing cycle is not monthly, the loan finance charge shall be deemed not to exceed ten percent (10%) per year if the loan finance charge contracted for and received does not exceed a percentage which bears the same relation to five-sixths of one percent as the number of days in the billing cycle bears to thirty (30); and

“(iii) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, if there is an unpaid balance on the date as of which the loan finance charge is applied, the lender may contract for and receive a charge not exceeding fifty cents ($.50) if the billing cycle is monthly or longer, or the pro rata part of fifty cents ($.50) which bears the same relation to fifty cents ($.50) as the number of days in the billing cycle bears to thirty (30) if the billing cycle is shorter than monthly, but no charge may be made pursuant to this paragraph if the lender has made an annual charge for the same period as permitted by the provisions on additional charges (W.S. 40-14-311(a)(iii))."

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Cross references. —

As to applicability of this part to consumer related loans, see §

40-14-356

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “finance charge” under § 106(a) of the Truth in Lending Act (15 USC § 1605(a)) or applicable regulations 154 ALR Fed 431.

§ 40-14-311.
Additional charges.

In addition to the loan finance charge permitted by this article, a lender may contract for and receive the following additional charges in connection with a consumer loan:

Official fees and taxes;

Charges for insurance as described in subsection (b) of this section;

Annual charges, payable in advance, for the privilege of using a lender credit card or similar arrangement which entitles the user to purchase goods or services from at least one hundred (100) persons not related to the issuer of the lender credit card or similar arrangement, under an arrangement pursuant to which the debts resulting from the purchases are payable to the issuer;

Charges excluded from the loan finance charge by the federal Consumer Credit Protection Act or by rule adopted by the administrator.

An additional charge may be made for insurance written in connection with the loan, other than insurance protecting the lender against the debtor’s default or other credit loss:

With respect to insurance against loss of or damage to property, or against liability, if the lender furnishes a clear and specific statement in writing to the debtor, setting forth the cost of the insurance if obtained from or through the lender, and stating that the debtor may choose the person through whom the insurance is to be obtained;

With respect to consumer credit insurance providing life, accident, or health coverage, if the insurance coverage is not a factor in the approval by the lender of the extension of credit, and this fact is clearly disclosed in writing to the debtor, and if, in order to obtain the insurance in connection with the extension of credit, the debtor gives specific affirmative written indication of his desire to do so after written disclosure to him of the cost thereof.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 124, § 3.

Reasonable closing costs (W.S. 40-14-140(a)(v)) are additional charges.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-202; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-202; Laws 1975, ch. 167, § 1; 1989, ch. 187, § 1; 1996, ch. 86, § 3; 1997, ch. 115, § 1; 2013 ch. 124, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 79, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to consumer credit insurance, see article 4 of this chapter.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote (a)(iv) and repealed (b)(iii) which read: “(iii) With respect to mechanical breakdown insurance, if: (A) Before consummation of the loan the lender furnishes a clear and specific statement in writing to the debtor setting forth the cost of the insurance and a copy of the policy; (B) The insurance coverage is not a factor in the approval by the lender of the extension of credit and that fact is clearly disclosed in writing to the debtor; and (C) The debtor gives specific affirmative written indication of his desire to purchase the insurance.”

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(iv), added “Protection” to “Consumer Credit Protection Act.”

Laws 2014, ch. 79, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Lender's Labyrinth and the Banker's Burden: The Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974 and the 1975 Amendments,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 383 (1976).

§ 40-14-312.
Delinquency charges.

With respect to a consumer loan, refinancing, or consolidation, the parties may contract for a delinquency charge on any installment not paid in full within ten (10) days after its scheduled due date in an amount not exceeding the greater of:

Five percent (5%) of the unpaid amount of the installment; or

Ten dollars ($10.00).

A delinquency charge under paragraph (a)(i) of this section may be collected only once on an installment however long it remains in default. No delinquency charge may be collected if the installment has been deferred and a deferral charge (W.S.

40-14-313

) has been paid or incurred until ten (10) days after the deferred due date. A delinquency charge may be collected at the time it accrues or at any time thereafter.

No delinquency charge may be collected on an installment which is paid in full within ten (10) days after its scheduled installment due date even though an earlier maturing installment or a delinquency charge on an earlier installment may not have been paid in full. For purposes of this subsection payments are applied first to current installments and then to delinquent installments.

If two (2) installments or parts thereof of a precomputed loan are in default for ten (10) days or more, the lender may elect to convert the loan from a precomputed loan to one in which the loan finance charge is based on unpaid balances. In this event he shall make a rebate pursuant to the provisions on rebate upon prepayment (W.S.

40-14-319

) as of the maturity date of the first delinquent installment, and thereafter may make a loan finance charge as authorized by the provisions on loan finance charge for consumer loans (W.S.

40-14-310

). The amount of the rebate shall not be reduced by the amount of any permitted minimum charge (W.S.

40-14-319

). If the lender proceeds under this subsection, any delinquency or deferral charges made with respect to installments due at or after the maturity date of the first delinquent installment shall be rebated, and no further delinquency or deferral charges shall be made.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-203; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-203; 1996, ch. 86, § 2; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted "or the provisions on loan finance charge for supervised loans (W.S.

40-14-348

), whichever is appropriate" at the end of the second sentence of (d).

§ 40-14-313.
Deferral charges.

With respect to a consumer loan, refinancing, or consolidation, the parties before or after default may agree in writing to a deferral of all or part of one (1) or more unpaid installments, and the lender may make and collect a charge which the debtor expressly agrees to pay as consideration for a deferral. A deferral charge may be collected at the time it is assessed or at any time thereafter.

The lender, in addition to the deferral charge, may make appropriate additional charges (W.S.

40-14-311

), and the amount of these charges which is not paid in cash may be added to the amount deferred for the purpose of calculating the deferral charge.

Except in connection with a revolving loan account, the parties may agree in writing at the time of a consumer loan, refinancing, or consolidation that if an installment is not paid within ten (10) days after its due date, the lender may unilaterally grant a deferral and make charges as provided in this section. No deferral charge may be made for a period after the date that the lender elects to accelerate the maturity of the agreement.

A delinquency charge made by the lender on an installment may not be retained if a deferral charge is made pursuant to this section with respect to the period of delinquency.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-204; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-204; Laws 1996, ch. 86, § 2.

§ 40-14-314.
Loan finance charge on refinancing.

With respect to a consumer loan, refinancing or consolidation, the lender may by agreement with the debtor refinance the unpaid balance and may contract for and receive a loan finance charge based on the principal resulting from the refinancing at a rate not exceeding that permitted by the provisions on loan finance charge for consumer loans (W.S.

40-14-310

). For the purpose of determining the loan finance charge permitted, the principal resulting from the refinancing comprises the following:

If the transaction was not precomputed, the total of the unpaid balance and the accrued charges on the date of the refinancing, or, if the transaction was precomputed, the amount which the debtor would have been required to pay upon prepayment pursuant to the provisions on rebate upon prepayment (W.S.

40-14-319

) on the date of refinancing, except that for the purpose of computing this amount no minimum charge (W.S.

40-14-319

) shall be allowed; and

Appropriate additional charges (W.S.

40-14-311

), payment of which is deferred.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-205; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-205; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted "or the provisions on loan finance charge for supervised loans (W.S.

40-14-348

), whichever is appropriate" at the end of the first sentence of (a).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 40-14-315.
Loan finance charge on consolidation.

If a debtor owes an unpaid balance to a lender with respect to a consumer loan, refinancing or consolidation, and becomes obligated on another consumer loan, refinancing or consolidation with the same lender, the parties may agree to a consolidation resulting in a single schedule of payments. If the previous consumer loan, refinancing, or consolidation was not precomputed, the parties may agree to add the unpaid amount of principal and accrued charges on the date of consolidation to the principal with respect to the subsequent loan. If the previous consumer loan, refinancing, or consolidation was precomputed, the parties may agree to refinance the unpaid balance pursuant to the provisions on refinancing (W.S.

40-14-314

) and to consolidate the principal resulting from the refinancing by adding it to the principal with respect to the subsequent loan. In either case the lender may contract for and receive a loan finance charge based on the aggregate principal resulting from the consolidation at a rate not in excess of that permitted by the provisions on loan finance charge for consumer loans (W.S.

40-14-310

).

The parties may agree to consolidate the unpaid balance of a consumer loan with the unpaid balance of a consumer credit sale. The parties may agree to refinance the previous unpaid balance pursuant to the provisions on refinancing sales (W.S.

40-14-216

) or the provisions on refinancing loans (W.S.

40-14-314

), whichever is appropriate, and to consolidate the amount financed resulting from the refinancing or the principal resulting from the refinancing by adding it to the amount financed or principal with respect to the subsequent sale or loan. The aggregate amount resulting from the consolidation shall be deemed principal, and the creditor may contract for and receive a loan finance charge based on the principal at a rate not in excess of that permitted by the provisions on loan finance charge for consumer loans (W.S.

40-14-310

).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-206; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-206; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted "or the provisions on loan finance charge for supervised loans (W.S.

40-14-348

), whichever is appropriate" at the end of the last sentence of (a); and deleted "or the provisions on loan finance charge for supervised loans (W.S.

40-14-348

), whichever is appropriate" at the end of the last sentence of (b).

§ 40-14-316.
Conversion to revolving loan account.

The parties may agree to add to a revolving loan account the unpaid balance of a consumer loan, not made pursuant to a revolving loan account, or a refinancing, or consolidation thereof, or the unpaid balance of a consumer credit sale, refinancing or consolidation. For the purpose of this section:

The unpaid balance of a consumer loan, refinancing, or consolidation is an amount equal to the principal determined according to the provisions on refinancing (W.S.

40-14-314

); and

The unpaid balance of a consumer credit sale, refinancing, or consolidation is an amount equal to the amount financed determined according to the provisions on refinancing (W.S.

40-14-216

).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-207; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-207.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 40-14-317.
Advances to perform covenants of debtor.

If the agreement with respect to a consumer loan, refinancing, or consolidation contains covenants by the debtor to perform certain duties pertaining to insuring or preserving collateral and if the lender pursuant to the agreement pays for performance of the duties on behalf of the debtor, the lender may add the amounts paid to the debt. Within a reasonable time after advancing any sums, he shall state to the debtor in writing the amount of the sums advanced, any charges with respect to this amount, and any revised payment schedule and, if the duties of the debtor performed by the lender pertain to insurance, a brief description of the insurance paid for by the lender including the type and amount of coverages. No further information need be given.

A loan finance charge may be made for sums advanced pursuant to subsection (a) of this section at a rate not exceeding the rate stated to the debtor pursuant to the laws relating to disclosure with respect to the loan, refinancing, or consolidation, except that with respect to a revolving loan account the amount of the advance may be added to the unpaid balance of the debt and the lender may make a loan finance charge not exceeding that permitted by the provisions on loan finance charge for consumer loans (W.S.

40-14-310

).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-208; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-208; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted "or for supervised loans (W.S.

40-14-348

), whichever is appropriate" at the end of (b).

§ 40-14-318.
Right to prepay.

Subject to the provisions on rebate upon prepayment (W.S.

40-14-319

), the debtor may prepay in full the unpaid balance of a consumer loan, refinancing, or consolidation at any time without penalty.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-209; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-209.

§ 40-14-319.
Rebate upon prepayment.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, upon prepayment in full of the unpaid balance of a precomputed consumer loan, refinancing or consolidation, the unearned loan finance charge shall be refunded based on the Rule of 78's if the transaction under its original terms did not exceed sixty-one (61) monthly installments and upon the actuarial method, if the transaction by its original terms exceeded sixty-one (61) monthly installments. An amount not less than the unearned portion of the loan finance charge calculated according to this section shall be rebated to the debtor. With respect to irregular payment transactions, the administrator may prescribe by rule the refund formula. If the rebate otherwise required is less than one dollar ($1.00), no rebate need be made.

Upon prepayment in full of a consumer loan, other than one pursuant to a revolving loan account, a refinancing or consolidation, whether or not precomputed, the lender may collect or retain a minimum loan finance charge within the limits stated in W.S. 40-14-310(f).

If a deferral (W.S.

40-14-313

) has been agreed to, the unearned portion of the loan finance charge shall be computed without regard to the deferral. The amount of deferral charge earned at the date of prepayment shall also be calculated. If the deferral charge earned is less than the deferral charge paid, the difference shall be added to the unearned portion of the loan finance charge. If any part of a deferral charge has been earned but has not been paid, that part shall be subtracted from the unearned portion of the loan finance charge or shall be added to the unpaid balance.

This section does not preclude the collection or retention by the lender of delinquency charges (W.S.

40-14-312

).

If the maturity is accelerated for any reason and judgment is obtained, the debtor is entitled to the same rebate as if the payment had been made on the date judgment is entered.

Upon prepayment in full of a consumer loan by the proceeds of consumer credit insurance (W.S.

40-14-403

), the debtor or his estate is entitled to the same rebate as though the debtor had prepaid the agreement on the date the proceeds of the insurance are paid to the lender, but no later than ten (10) business days after satisfactory proof of loss is furnished to the lender.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-210; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-210; Laws 1973, ch. 190, § 3; 1979, ch. 117, § 1; 1996, ch. 86, § 2.